Utah statutes.
30-3-10.10.   Parenting plan -- Domestic violence.
(1)  In any proceeding regarding a parenting plan, the court shall consider
evidence of domestic violence, if presented.
(2)  If there is a protective order, civil stalking injunction, or the court
finds that a parent has committed domestic violence, the court shall consider
the impact of domestic violence in awarding parent-time, and make specific
findings regarding the award of parent-time.
(3)  If the court orders parent-time and a protective order or civil stalking
injunction is still in place, it shall consider whether to order the parents
to conduct parent-time pick-up and transfer through a third party.  The parent
who is the stated victim in the order or injunction may submit to the court,
and the court shall consider, the name of a person considered suitable to act
as the third party.
(4)  If the court orders the parents to conduct parent-time through a third
party, the parenting plan shall specify the time, day, place, manner, and the
third party to be used to implement the exchange.
